apertium-unm.unm@Dict-unm@Simp.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 

%{e%}

LEXICON Root 

Alpha ; 
Punct ; 
!Exceptions ;
Digits ;

LEXICON AlphaLoop 

Alpha ;
!Punct ; 
 # ;

LEXICON Alpha

A:A AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ; 
À:À AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
E:E AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
È:È AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Ë:Ë AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
I:I AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Ì:Ì AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
O:O AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Ò:Ò AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
U:U AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Ù:Ù AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;

a:a AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
à:à AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
e:e AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
è:è AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ë:ë AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
i:i AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ì:ì AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
o:o AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ò:ò AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
u:u AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
ù:ù AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;

B:B AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
C:C AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
D:D AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
F:F AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
G:G AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
H:H AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
J:J AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
K:K AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
L:L AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
M:M AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
N:N AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
P:P AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Q:Q AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
R:R AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
S:S AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
T:T AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
V:V AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
W:W AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
X:X AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Y:Y AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
Z:Z AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;

b:b AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
c:c AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
d:d AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
f:f AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
g:g AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
h:h AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
j:j AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
k:k AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
l:l AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
m:m AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
n:n AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
p:p AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
q:q AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
r:r AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
s:s AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
t:t AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
v:v AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
w:w AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
x:x AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
y:y AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;
z:z AlphaLoop "weight: 1.0" ;

LEXICON Digits

<[%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+> # ;

LEXICON Punct

%.:%. # ; 
%-:%- # ; 
%,:%, # ; 
%;:%; # ; 
%::%: # ; 
%!:%! # ; 
%?:%? # ; 
%“:%“ # ; 
%”:%” # ; 
%«:%« # ; 
%»:%» # ; 
%(:%( # ; 
%):%) # ; 
%–:%– # ; 
